Florida, session 2026, HB351.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 250.031, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
250.031 United States military installations; concurrent
legislative jurisdiction.—
(1) This state may accept the relinquishment of exclusive
legislative jurisdiction from the United States in accordance
with this section. This state has concurrent legislative
jurisdiction with the United States over any United States
military installation property indicated pursuant to this
section for as long as the United States controls the property.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb351-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 351 2026
(2) The concurrent legislative jurisdiction over a United
States military installation under this section is effective
upon the Governor's written acceptance of a request filed with
the Secretary of State by the principal officer, or other
authorized representative who has supervision or control over
the military installation under 10 U.S.C. s. 2683, of the
military installation where concurrent legislative jurisdiction
is sought, relinquishing exclusive legislative jurisdiction and
retaining concurrent legislative jurisdiction over the military
installation.
(3) The Governor may not accept a request filed under
subsection (2) unless the request:
(a) States the name, position, and legal authority of the
individual requesting the cession.
(b) Unambiguously states the subject matter for the
concurrent legislative jurisdiction request.
(c) Describes by metes and bounds the United States
military installation subject to the concurrent legislative
jurisdiction request.
(d) Indicates whether the concurrent legislative
jurisdiction request includes future contiguous expansions of
land acquired for military purposes.
(4) If the Governor accepts a request filed under
subsection (2):
(a) The Governor's acceptance must state each element of
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb351-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 351 2026
the concurrent legislative jurisdiction request which is
accepted.
(b) The Governor shall submit the following documents to
the appropriate recording office for indexing and submit copies
of the following documents to the individual who filed the
request for concurrent legislative jurisdiction:
1. The request for concurrent legislative jurisdiction.
2. The Governor's written acceptance of concurrent
legislative jurisdiction.
3. A description by metes and bounds of the United States
military installation subject to the concurrent legislative
jurisdiction.
(5) Upon request by the United States through an
authorized representative, the Governor is authorized to execute
appropriate documents to accomplish the cession granted by this
section.
(6) Upon establishment of concurrent legislative
jurisdiction under this section, a state agency, local
government, or special district may enter a reciprocal agreement
with a United States agency to designate duties related to the
concurrent legislative jurisdiction between the parties.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb351-01-c1